Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md H.F. 2674 Section 1. Section 162.2, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 162.2, subsections 8 and 9, Code 2026, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 8. a. âCommercial breederâ means a person, engaged in the 5 business of breeding dogs or cats, who sells, exchanges, or 6 leases dogs or cats in return for consideration, or who offers 7 to do so, whether or not the animals are raised, trained, 8 groomed, or boarded by the person. A 9 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , âcommercial breederâ 10 does not mean a person who owns or harbors three six or fewer 11 breeding males or females is not a commercial breeder females, 12 age twelve months or older . 13 9. âCommercial establishmentâ or âestablishmentâ means an 14 animal shelter, boarding kennel, commercial breeder, commercial 15 kennel, dealer, pet shop, pound, public auction, or research 16 facility. 17 Sec. 3. Section 162.2, subsection 26, paragraph a, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 a. A boarding kennel, commercial kennel , or pet shop to whom 20 a state license is issued by the department pursuant to section 21 162.2A . 22 Sec. 4. Section 162.2A, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 23 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 b. A state license for a boarding kennel, commercial kennel , 25 or pet shop. 26 Sec. 5. Section 162.4A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 162.4A Operation of a research facility ââ certificate of 29 registration. 30 A research facility shall only operate pursuant to a 31 certificate of registration issued by the department as 32 provided in section 162.2A . The research facility shall 33 maintain records as required by the department in order for the 34 department to ensure the research facilityâs compliance with 35 -1- HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md 1/ 8 H.F. 2674 the provisions of this chapter . A research facility shall not 1 purchase a dog or cat from a commercial establishment that does 2 not have a valid authorization issued or renewed under this 3 chapter or a similar authorization issued or renewed by another 4 state . 5 Sec. 6. Section 162.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 162.5 Operation of a pet shop ââ state license. 8 A pet shop shall only operate pursuant to a state license 9 issued or renewed by the department pursuant to section 10 162.2A . The pet shop shall maintain records as required by the 11 department in order for the department to ensure the pet shopâs 12 compliance with the provisions of this chapter . A pet shop 13 shall not purchase a dog or cat from a commercial establishment 14 that does not have a valid authorization issued or renewed 15 under this chapter or a similar authorization issued or renewed 16 by another state . 17 Sec. 7. Section 162.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 162.6 Operation of a commercial kennel ââ state license. 20 A commercial kennel shall only operate pursuant to a state 21 license issued or renewed by the department as provided in 22 section 162.2A . A commercial kennel shall maintain records 23 as required by the department in order for the department to 24 ensure the commercial kennelâs compliance with the provisions 25 of this chapter . A commercial kennel shall not purchase a dog 26 or cat from a commercial establishment that does not have a 27 valid authorization issued or renewed under this chapter or a 28 similar authorization issued or renewed by another state . 29 Sec. 8. Section 162.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 162.7 Operation of a dealer ââ state license or permit. 32 A dealer shall only operate pursuant to a state license, 33 or a permit , issued or renewed by the department as provided 34 in section 162.2A . A dealer who is a state licensee shall 35 -2- HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md 2/ 8 H.F. 2674 maintain records as required by the department in order for the 1 department to ensure compliance with the provisions of this 2 chapter . A dealer who is a permittee may but is not required 3 to maintain records. A dealer shall not purchase a dog or cat 4 from a commercial establishment that does not have a valid 5 authorization issued or renewed under this chapter or a similar 6 authorization issued or renewed by another state . 7 Sec. 9. Section 162.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 162.8 Operation of a commercial breeder ââ state license or 10 permit. 11 A commercial breeder shall only operate pursuant to a state 12 license, or a permit, issued or renewed by the department 13 as provided in section 162.2A . A commercial breeder who is 14 a state licensee shall maintain records as required by the 15 department in order for the department to ensure the commercial 16 breederâs compliance with the provisions of this chapter . A 17 commercial breeder who is a permittee may but is not required 18 to maintain records. A commercial breeder shall not purchase a 19 dog or cat from a commercial establishment that does not have a 20 valid authorization issued or renewed under this chapter or a 21 similar authorization issued or renewed by another state . 22 Sec. 10. Section 162.9A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 162.9A Operation of a public auction ââ state license or 25 permit. 26 A public auction shall only operate pursuant to a state 27 license, or a permit, issued or renewed by the department as 28 provided in section 162.2A . A public auction which that is 29 a state licensee shall maintain records as required by the 30 department in order for the department to ensure the public 31 auctionâs compliance with the provisions of this chapter . 32 A public auction which that is a permittee may but is not 33 required to maintain records. A public auction shall not 34 purchase a dog or cat from a commercial establishment that does 35 -3- HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md 3/ 8 H.F. 2674 not have a valid authorization issued or renewed under this 1 chapter or a similar authorization issued or renewed by another 2 state . 3 Sec. 11. Section 162.10B, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 162.10B Commercial establishments ââ inspecting state 6 licensees and registrants. 7 1. The department may inspect the commercial establishment 8 of a registrant or state licensee by entering onto its 9 business premises at any time during normal working hours. The 10 department may inspect records required to be maintained by the 11 state licensee or registrant as provided in this chapter . If 12 the owner or person in charge of the commercial establishment 13 refuses admittance, the department may obtain an administrative 14 search warrant issued under section 808.14 . 15 2. a. The department shall determine the frequency 16 of inspections of a commercial establishment conducted 17 pursuant to subsection 1 based upon a risk assessment of 18 the establishmentâs compliance with the standard of care 19 requirement in section 162.10A, subsection 1. 20 b. Paragraph âaâ does not limit the department from 21 conducting an inspection as necessary to ensure a commercial 22 establishment is complying with the requirements of this 23 chapter. 24 c. Upon receipt of credible evidence that a commercial 25 establishment may be in violation of the standard of care 26 requirement provided in section 162.10A, subsection 1, the 27 department shall inspect the establishment or initiate an 28 investigation of the establishment. 29 Sec. 12. Section 162.10C, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 30 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. A United States department of agriculture 32 inspection report indicating that the permittee is breaching 33 a standard of care required of permittees by section 162.10A. 34 The department of agriculture and land stewardship shall not 35 -4- HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md 4/ 8 H.F. 2674 enter onto the permitteeâs premises based on that report two 1 years after the date that the report was published. 2 Sec. 13. Section 162.10D, Code 2026, is amended by adding 3 the following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 01. a. The department may suspend or 5 revoke an authorization issued or renewed to a commercial 6 establishment under this chapter for a violation of a provision 7 of this chapter. 8 b. A violation of this chapter includes any of the 9 following: 10 (1) The refusal of a commercial establishment to allow 11 the department to conduct an inspection pursuant to a search 12 warrant. 13 (2) The effort of a person associated with the commercial 14 establishment to interfere with an inspection. 15 Sec. 14. Section 162.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 2. This chapter does not apply to a place or establishment 18 which that operates under the immediate supervision of a 19 duly licensed veterinarian as a hospital where animals are 20 harbored, hospitalized, and cared for incidental to the 21 treatment, prevention, or alleviation of disease processes 22 during the routine practice of the profession of veterinary 23 medicine. However, if animals are accepted by such a place, 24 establishment, or hospital for boarding or grooming for a 25 consideration, the place, establishment, or hospital is subject 26 to the licensing or registration requirements applicable to a 27 boarding kennel or commercial kennel under this chapter and the 28 rules adopted by the secretary. 29 Sec. 15. Section 162.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 162.12 Denial or revocation of license or registration. 32 A certificate of registration may be denied to any animal 33 shelter, pound, or research facility and a state license may 34 be denied to any public auction, boarding kennel, commercial 35 -5- HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md 5/ 8 H.F. 2674 kennel, pet shop, commercial breeder, or dealer, or an existing 1 certificate of registration or state license may be revoked by 2 the secretary if, after public hearing, it is determined that 3 the housing facilities or primary enclosures are inadequate 4 under this chapter or if the feeding, watering, cleaning, 5 and housing practices at the pound, animal shelter, public 6 auction, pet shop, boarding kennel, commercial kennel, or 7 research facility, or those practices by the commercial breeder 8 or dealer, are not in compliance with this chapter or with 9 the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter . The premises of 10 each registrant or state licensee shall be open for inspection 11 during normal business hours. 12 Sec. 16. Section 162.12A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 162.12A Civil penalties. 15 1. a. The department shall establish, impose, and assess 16 civil penalties for violations of this chapter . 17 b. A violation of this chapter includes any of the 18 following: 19 (1) The refusal by a commercial establishment to allow the 20 department to inspect the commercial establishment as provided 21 in section 162.10D. 22 (2) The effort of a person associated with the commercial 23 establishment to interfere with a departmentâs inspection as 24 provided in section 162.10D. 25 c. The department may by rule establish a schedule of civil 26 penalties for violations of this chapter . 27 d. All civil penalties collected under this section shall be 28 deposited into the general fund of the state. 29 1. 2. a. A commercial establishment that operates pursuant 30 to an authorization issued or renewed under this chapter is 31 subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred 32 dollars, regardless of the number of animals possessed or 33 controlled by the commercial establishment, for violating this 34 chapter . Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , each day that a 35 -6- HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md 6/ 8 H.F. 2674 violation continues shall be deemed a separate offense. 1 b. This paragraph applies to a commercial establishment 2 that violates a standard of care involving housing as provided 3 in section 162.10A . The departmental official who makes 4 a determination that a violation exists shall provide a 5 corrective plan to the commercial establishment describing how 6 the violation will be corrected within a compliance period of 7 not more than fifteen days from the date of approval by the 8 official of the corrective plan. The civil penalty shall not 9 exceed five hundred dollars for the first day of the violation. 10 After that day, the department shall not impose a civil penalty 11 for the violation during the compliance period. The department 12 shall not impose an additional civil penalty, unless the 13 commercial establishment fails to correct the violation by the 14 end of the compliance period. If the commercial establishment 15 fails to correct the violation by the end of the compliance 16 period, each day that the violation continues shall be deemed a 17 separate offense. 18 2. 3. A commercial establishment that does not operate 19 pursuant to an authorization issued or renewed under this 20 chapter is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one 21 thousand dollars, regardless of the number of animals possessed 22 or controlled by the commercial establishment, for violating 23 this chapter . Each day that a violation continues shall be 24 deemed a separate offense. 25 Sec. 17. Section 162.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 162.19 Abandoned animals destroyed. 28 1. Whenever any animal is left with a veterinarian , boarding 29 kennel or commercial kennel pursuant to a written agreement and 30 the owner does not claim the animal by the agreed date, the 31 animal shall be deemed abandoned, and a notice of abandonment 32 and its consequences shall be sent within seven days by 33 certified mail to the last known address of the owner. For 34 fourteen days after mailing of the notice the owner shall have 35 -7- HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md 7/ 8 H.F. 2674 the right to reclaim the animal upon payment of all reasonable 1 charges, and after the fourteen days the owner shall be deemed 2 to have waived all rights to the abandoned animal. If despite 3 diligent effort an owner cannot be found for the abandoned 4 animal within another seven days, the veterinarian , boarding 5 kennel, or commercial kennel may humanely destroy the abandoned 6 animal. 7 2. Each veterinarian , boarding kennel or commercial kennel 8 shall warn its patrons of the provisions of this section by a 9 conspicuously posted notice or by conspicuous type in a written 10 receipt. 11 Sec. 18. Section 717A.1, subsection 5, paragraph g, Code 12 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 13 Sec. 19. REPEAL. Section 162.5A, Code 2026, is repealed. 14 -8- HF 2674 (4) 91 da/js/md 8/ 8